Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.6q of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3312 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, every public
school in this state may annually provide students with age-
appropriate and grade-appropriate instruction on firearm safety.
The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET), in
consultation with the Department of Education, shall determine the
earliest appropriate age and grade for which firearm safety
instruction may be provided. In determining the earliest
appropriate grade for instruction on firearm safety, the Department
shall study all relevant data and risk factors, including the
earliest age at which incidents of injury involving firearms are
reported and the earliest age at which children are susceptible to
harm from found firearms. For purposes of this section, "public
schools" shall include charter schools and virtual charter schools.
B. 1. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training,
in consultation with the Department of Education, shall develop or
approve a curriculum or program of instruction on firearm safety.
The departments shall not approve curricula or programs of
instruction if the curricula, programs of instruction, or any
materials used as part of the curricula or programs of instruction
bear a brand or organizational affiliation. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this subsection, curricula, programs of instruction,
or any of the instructional materials used to educate students on
firearm safety in accordance with this section may bear a brand

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3312 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

issu ed by the State of Oklahoma or by any state department, agency,
or division.
2. The instruction provided pursuant to subsection A of this
section may be provided in a classroom setting, through the viewing
of a video, or through the review of online resources or materials,
as determined by the Department of Education.
3. Each school may determine how best to incorporate the
instruction provided pursuant to subsection A of this section into
the school year. Instruction by a CLEET-certified school resource
officer, or local member of law enforcement currently certified by
CLEET, shall be considered best practice.
C. The instruction provided pursuant to subsection A of this
section shall be age-appropriate and shall adhere to the following:
1. Kindergarten through fifth grade students shall be taught
basic firearm safety including, but not limited to:
a. stop,
b. do not touch,
c. leave the area, and
d. tell an adult;
2. Students in grades six through twelve shall be provided
instruction on best practices and guidelines for safe handling and
storage of a firearm to prevent accidents and ensure safety. Such
instruction shall include, but not be limited to, teaching students:
a. safe storage of firearms,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3312 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. school safety relating to firearms,
c. how to avoid injury if the student finds a firearm,
d. to never touch a found firearm, and
e. to immediately notify an adult of the location of a
found firearm;
3. All instruction shall be viewpoint neutral on political
topics such as gun rights and gun violence; and
4. Instruction shall not include the use or presence of live
ammunition, live fire, or live firearms.
D. If a school district decides to require firearm safety
instruction to students, each school within said district shall
notify parents and legal guardians of the required instruction and
include an option with details on how to opt their student out of
said instruction. A school may provide an alternative educational
activity to a student whose parent or legal guardian has opted them
out of the firearm safety instruction.
E. Each public school may begin firearm instruction at the
grade level determined by CLEET in accordance with subsection A of
this section. A public school may elect to begin age-appropriate
firearm instruction earlier than the earliest grade level determined
by CLEET if appropriate for its school district.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3312 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
April 14, 2026 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3312 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)